District of Columbia statutes.
42-703

Remainder to heirs of life tenant; rule in Shelley’s case abolished.

Where a remainder shall be limited to the heirs or heirs of the body of a person to whom a life estate in the same premises shall be given, the persons who, on the termination of the life estate, shall be the heirs or the heirs of the body of such tenant for life shall be entitled to take in fee simple as purchasers by virtue of the remainder so limited.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1352, ch. 854, § 1027

Cross References

Personal property, applicable laws, see § 42-523.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-403.
1973 Ed., § 45-203.